Wyoming, session 2025, HB0012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi) and by creating a new subsection (c) is
amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

HB0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0044
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xlvi) Property that is stored by the purchaser
in this state before the first installation of the property
as industrial production equipment in this state, in
accordance with the conditions and requirements of
subsection (c) of this section.

(c) Industrial production equipment that is stored in
this state before the first installation of the property in
this state shall be exempt from property taxation during
the storage or inventory period for a period not to exceed
two (2) reporting periods, in accordance with the
following:

(i) As used in this subsection:

(A) "Commercial storage facility" means a
facility operated by a person who is not the taxpayer where
industrial production equipment is temporarily stored
before installation and that has been approved by the
department;
HB0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0044

(B) "Industrial production" means any of
the following:

(I) Manufacturing, milling,
converting, producing, processing or fabricating materials;

(II) The extraction or processing of
minerals;

(III) The mechanical, chemical or
electronic transformation of property into energy or new
products.

(C) "Industrial production equipment" means
any equipment designed specifically for use in industrial
production or energy production, including pipes necessary
for pipelines used for the transportation of minerals and
excluding mobile machinery;

(D) "Mobile machinery" means any equipment,
machinery or vehicle that can move from place to place
under its own power or that can be moved, transported or
HB0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0044
towed from place to place, including equipment, machinery
or vehicles that are used to transport industrial
production equipment.

(ii) To qualify for the exemption under this
subsection, Wyoming sales or use tax shall be paid on the
property upon removal of the property from the commercial
storage facility;

(iii) The county assessor or the department may
require any documentation necessary to verify that the
industrial production equipment is eligible for the
exemption under this subsection;

(iv) To qualify for the exemption, the
industrial production equipment shall be temporarily stored
or placed in inventory at a commercial storage facility
that has been approved by the department;

(v) Industrial production equipment that
qualifies for the exemption under this section may remain
eligible for the exemption under this subsection if the
equipment remains in temporary storage or inventory at a
HB0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0044
commercial storage facility, provided that the purchaser
does not install or fix the equipment for use in industrial
production;

(vi) The exemption under this subsection shall
not apply to:

(A) Industrial production equipment with a
sales price of less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000.00);

(B) Mobile machinery;

(C) Raw materials used in industrial
production.

(vii) The department shall promulgate rules for
the application of the exemption under this subsection,
including rules to:

(A) Require taxpayers to notify the
department and the county assessor, as applicable, of the
HB0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0044
purchase, storage and installation of qualifying industrial
production equipment;

(B) Specify the requirements and
qualifications for a facility or location to qualify as a
commercial storage facility.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0012